Idaho statutes. Title 1 COURTS AND COURT OFFICIALS
Chapter 18
DISQUALIFICATION OF JUDGES

Section.

§ 1-1801. Cases in which judge disqualified. [Repealed.]

§ 1-1802. Judge cannot act as attorney.

A judge cannot act as attorney or counsel in a court in which he is judge, or in an action or proceeding removed therefrom to another court for trial or review, or in an action or proceeding from which an appeal may lie to his own court.

§ 1-1803. Supreme and district judges.

A justice of the Supreme Court or judge of the district court cannot act as attorney or counsel in any court, except in an action or proceeding to which he is a party on the record.

§ 1-1804. Judge not to have law partner.

No judge or other judicial officer shall have a partner acting as attorney or counsel in any court of this state.